Utah statutes.
62A-15-616.   Persons entering state mentally ill.

(1)  A person who enters this state while mentally ill may be returned by a local mental health authority to the home of relatives or friends of that person with a mental illness, if known, or to a hospital in the state where that person with a mental illness is domiciled, in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 15, Part 8, Interstate Compact on Mental Health.

(2)  This section does not prevent commitment of persons who are traveling through or temporarily residing in this state.

